Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-1203
Secretary of State; State Records
Administrator; duties.

The Secretary of State is hereby designated
the State Records Administrator. The
administrator shall establish and administer, within and for state and local
agencies, (1) a records management program which will apply efficient, cost-effective, modern, and
economical methods to the creation, utilization, maintenance, retention, preservation,
and disposal of state and local records, (2) a program for the selection and
preservation of essential state and local records, (3) establish and maintain
a depository for the storage and service of state records, and advise, assist,
and govern by rules and regulations the establishment of similar programs
in local political subdivisions in the state, and (4) establish and maintain
a central microfilm agency for state records and advise, assist, and govern
by rules and regulations the establishment of similar programs in state agencies
and local political subdivisions in the State of Nebraska.

Laws 1961, c. 455, § 3, p. 1387;

Laws 1969, c. 841, § 2, p. 3169;

Laws 1977, LB 520, § 1;

Laws 1979, LB 559, § 2;

Laws 2012, LB880, § 2.